Wyoming, session 2026, HB0043.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-3-1101 through 6-3-1103 are created
to read:
ARTICLE 11
MONEY LAUNDERING AND ILLEGAL INVESTMENT
6-3-1101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Financial or business institution" includes
a foreign or domestic money transmitter or an authorized
agent thereof, casino, check casher, person engaged in a
trade or business or any other person required by state or
federal law to report regarding currency transactions or
suspicious transactions.
6-3-1102. Money laundering; penalties.
(a) A person is guilty of money laundering if the
person:
(i) Transports or possesses property the person
knows or reasonably should know to be derived from criminal
activity or represent proceeds of criminal activity;
(ii) Directs, organizes, finances, plans,
manages, supervises or controls the transportation of or
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0043
ENROLLED ACT NO. 30, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
transactions in property the person knows or reasonably
should know to be derived from criminal activity or
represent proceeds of criminal activity; or
(iii) Engages in a transaction involving
property the person knows or reasonably should know to be
derived from criminal activity or represent proceeds of
criminal activity:
(A) With the intent to facilitate or
promote the criminal activity; or
(B) Knowing that the transaction is
designed, in whole or in part:
(I) To conceal or disguise the nature,
location, source, ownership or control of the property
derived from criminal activity; or
(II) To avoid a transaction reporting
requirement under the laws of this state, any other state
or of the United States. For purposes of this subdivision,
the transaction or transactions shall not be required to
exceed any transaction reporting threshold under state or
federal law at any single financial or business institution
on any single day.
(b) Money laundering is a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of
not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.
(c) This section shall not apply to a financial
institution whose deposits are insured by the federal
deposit insurance corporation or the national credit union
share insurance fund or to its employees with respect to
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0043
ENROLLED ACT NO. 30, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
transactions for depositors or borrowers unless an employee
conducts those transactions with the intent to do one (1)
or more of the following:
(i) To facilitate or promote criminal activity;
(ii) To conceal or disguise the nature,
location, source, ownership or control of property derived
from criminal activity;
(iii) To avoid a transaction reporting
requirement under the laws of Wyoming, the United States or
another state.
6-3-1103. Illegal investment; penalties.
(a) A person is guilty of illegal investment if, with
the intent to evade a transaction reporting requirement of
this state or of 31 U.S.C. § 5311 et seq. or 31 C.F.R. §
1010.100 et seq., or any rules or regulations adopted under
those chapters and sections, the person:
(i) Causes a financial or business institution
to fail to report or to file a report that contains a
material omission or misstatement of fact; or
(ii) Structures or assists in structuring any
transaction with one (1) or more financial or business
institutions. For purposes of this paragraph, "structures"
or "structuring" means that a person, acting alone, or in
conjunction with or on behalf of other persons, conducts
one (1) or more currency transactions, in any amount, at
one (1) or more financial or business institutions, on one
(1) or more days, in any manner, for the purpose of evading
currency transaction reporting requirement of this state or
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0043
ENROLLED ACT NO. 30, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
of 31 U.S.C. § 5311 et seq. or 31 C.F.R. § 1010.100 et
seq., or any rules or regulations adopted under those
chapters and sections. For purposes of this paragraph, the
transaction or transactions need not exceed any reporting
threshold under state or federal law at any single
financial or business institution on any single day.
(b) Illegal investment is a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of
not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4